test/src/morphology/verbTVit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Contracted -o transitive verbs. TSIEGGIT_TV

Tests:
  Verb - lievddit: # TSIEGGIT_TV
    lievddit+V+TV+Inf: lievddit 
    lievddit+V+TV+Sup: lievdditjit
    lievddit+V+TV+Ger: lievdddidijn
    lievddit+V+TV+PrfPrc: lievddim
    lievddit+V+TV+Actio+Ess: lievddimin
    lievddit+V+TV+Actio+Ela: lievddmis
    lievddit+V+TV+VAbess: lievddik
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lievddiv
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lievddi
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lievddi
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: lievddijin 
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: lievddibihtte
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: lievddiba
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lievddiji
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lievddijiv
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lievddiji
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lievddij
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: lievddijma 
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: lievddijda
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lievddin
    lievddit+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: lievddijin
    lievddit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl1: lievdddijip
    lievddit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: [lievdddijit, lievddijihtit]
    lievddit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: lievddijisá
    lievddit+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: lievddijuhtut
    lievddit+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: lievddijusá
    lievddit+V+TV+Pot+Pl1: lievdditjip
    lievddit+V+TV+Pot+Pl2: lievdditjihpit
    lievddit+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: lievdditji

  Verb - alvvit: # JÅRGGOT_TV
    alvvit+V+TV+Inf: alvvit 
    alvvit+V+TV+Sup: alvvitjit
    alvvit+V+TV+Ger: alvvidijn
    alvvit+V+TV+PrfPrc: alvvim
    alvvit+V+TV+Actio+Ess: alvvimin
    alvvit+V+TV+Actio+Ela: alvvimis
    alvvit+V+TV+VAbess: alvvik
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: alvviv
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: alvvi
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: alvvibihtit
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: alvviji
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: alvvijiv
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: alvviji
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: alvvij
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: alvvijima 
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: alvvijida
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: alvvijiga
    alvvit+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: alvvi
    alvvit+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: alvvijis
    alvvit+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: alvvijinno 
    alvvit+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: alvvijihtte
    alvvit+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: alvvijiska
    alvvit+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: alvvijup
    alvvit+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: alvvijuhtut
    alvvit+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: alvvijusá
    alvvit+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: alvvitjav
    alvvit+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: alvvitja
    alvvit+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: alvvisj
    alvvit+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: alvvitji
